California, session 20252026, AB506.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 122225) is added to Chapter 5 of Part 6 of Division 105 of the Health and Safety Code, to read: Article 2.5. Sale of Dogs, Cats, and Rabbits122225. For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:(a) “Pet dealer” has the same meaning as Section 122125.(b) “Public animal control agency or shelter” has the same meaning as defined in Section 122354.5.(c) “Purchaser” has the same meaning as defined in Section 122125.122226. A person, pet dealer, or business that sells a dog, cat, or rabbit to a purchaser located in California shall provide a written notice to the purchaser or recipient of the dog, cat, or rabbit that states all of the following:(a) The original source of the dog, cat, or rabbit, including, but not limited to:(1) The breeder.(2) If applicable, the United States Department of Agriculture license number associated with the breeder.(3) The state that the dog, cat, or rabbit was born in.(4) If any of this information is unknown, the seller shall state that this information is unknown and shall provide any related information known by the seller, seller’s agents, or seller’s employees. The record shall contain a statement that the information is complete and true to the best of the seller’s knowledge.(b) A record of inoculations and worming treatments administered, if any, to the dog, cat, or rabbit as of the time of sale, including dates of administration and the type of vaccine or worming treatment.(c) A record of any veterinarian treatment or medication received by the dog, cat, or rabbit while in the possession of the person, pet dealer, or business and a statement, signed by the person, pet dealer, or business at the time of sale, containing the information required by paragraph (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 122050 relating to the dog, cat, or rabbit to be purchased.122227. (a) A contract entered into on or after January 1, 2026, to transfer ownership of a dog, cat, or rabbit to a purchaser that is offered, negotiated, brokered, or otherwise arranged by a person, pet dealer, or business while the purchaser is located in California is void as against public policy if the contract includes or requires a nonrefundable deposit.(b) If money is exchanged pursuant to a contract that is void pursuant to this section, the seller shall refund the money to the purchaser within 30 days of receiving notice that the contract is void pursuant to this section without expectation of return of the contract subject.122228. (a) A person, pet dealer, or business shall not offer a contract that contains a term that violates Section 122226 or 122227.(b) A person, pet dealer, or business who offers a contract that contains a term that violates Section 122226 or 122227 may be sued in any court of competent jurisdiction for the recovery of money exchanged pursuant to that contract, injunctive relief, and other remedies the court deems appropriate.(1) A purchaser affected by a violation of Section 122226 or 122227 may bring a civil action pursuant to this subdivision against the person, pet dealer, or business in violation of those sections.(2) A prevailing plaintiff in an action brought pursuant to this subdivision shall be entitled to reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.(c) The Attorney General, a county counsel, a district attorney, a city attorney, or a city prosecutor shall have the authority to enforce this article in an action brought in the name of the people of the State of California in any court of competent jurisdiction. The authority provided to a public prosecutor by this subdivision is not an exclusive remedy and does not affect any other relief or remedy provided by law.122229. This article does not limit a contract for the transfer of ownership of an animal to or by a governmental agency or the transfer of ownership of a guide, signal, or service dog, as defined in Section 54.1 of the Civil Code.122230. This article does not apply to a public animal control agency or shelter.122231. Nothing in this article shall be construed as amending the requirements of Article 1, 2, 3, or 4 of this chapter.